Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.170

Delegation.

(1) Physical therapists are responsible for patient care given by assistive personnel under their supervision. A physical therapist may delegate to assistive personnel and supervise selected acts, tasks, or procedures that fall within the scope of physical therapy practice but do not exceed the education or training of the assistive personnel.

(2) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit other licensed health care providers from using the services of physical therapist assistants, as long as the title "physical therapist assistant" is not used in violation of RCW 18.74.090, physical therapist aides, or other assistive personnel as long as the licensed health care provider is responsible for the activities of such assistants, aides, and other personnel and provides appropriate supervision.

[ 2007 c 98 s 15; 2005 c 501 s 6.]